Washington statutes.
RCW 10.46.190

Liability of convicted person for costs—Jury fee.

Every person convicted of a crime or held to bail to keep the peace may be liable to all the costs of the proceedings against him or her, including, when tried by a jury in the superior court or before a committing magistrate, a jury fee as provided for in civil actions for which judgment shall be rendered and collected. The court shall not order a defendant to pay costs, as described in RCW 10.01.160, if the court finds that the person at the time of sentencing is indigent as defined in RCW 10.01.160(3). The jury fee, when collected for a case tried by the superior court, shall be paid to the clerk and applied as the jury fee in civil cases is applied.

[ 2022 c 260 s 20; 2018 c 269 s 9; 2005 c 457 s 12; 1977 ex.s. c 248 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 53 s 1; 1961 c 304 s 8; Code 1881 s 2105; 1869 p 418 s 3; RRS s 2227.]

NOTES:

Construction—Effective date—2022 c 260: See notes following RCW 3.66.120.

Construction—2018 c 269: See note following RCW 10.82.090.

Intent—2005 c 457: See note following RCW 43.08.250.

Disposition of fines and costs: Chapter 10.82 RCW.

Jury

fees: RCW 4.44.110, 36.18.020.

in district court: RCW 10.04.050.